District of Columbia statutes.
47-1333

Sale not subject to procurement.

Notwithstanding any other law, sale or assignment under this chapter or in furtherance thereof shall not be subject to subchapter I of Chapter 3 of Title 2.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 33(o), 49 DCR 8140
D.C. Law 14-213 validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).